ro-RO: Dimensiune receptor cuplaj compatibil: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Altele
nb: Kompatibel størrelse på tilhengerfestet: 1,25 tommer (1-1/4"); 2 tommer (2"); 2,5 tommer (2-1/2"); 3 tommer (3"); Annet
ru: Совместимый размер приемника фаркопа: 1,25 дюйма (1-1/4"); 2 дюйма (2"); 2,5 дюйма (2-1/2"); 3 дюйма (3"); Другое
vi: Kích thước lỗ móc kéo tương thích: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Khác
zh-CN: 适配拖车方口尺寸: 1.25 英寸 (1-1/4"); 2 英寸 (2"); 2.5 英寸 (2-1/2"); 3 英寸 (3"); 其他
de: Kompatible Größe der Anhängerkupplungsaufnahme: 1,25 Zoll (1-1/4"); 2 Zoll (2"); 2,5 Zoll (2-1/2"); 3 Zoll (3"); Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel storlek på dragkroksfästet: 1,25 tum (1-1/4"); 2 tum (2"); 2,5 tum (2-1/2"); 3 tum (3"); Övrigt
fr: Taille de support d’attelage compatible: 1,25 po (1-1/4 po); 2 po (2 po); 2,5 po (2-1/2 po); 3 po (3 po); Autre
sk-SK: kompatibilná veľkosť ťažného zariadenia: 1,25 palca (1-1/4"); 2 palce (2"); 2,5 palca (2-1/2"); 3 palce (3"); Iné
cs: Kompatibilní velikost přijímače tažného zařízení: 1,25 palce (1-1/4"); 2 palce (2"); 2,5 palce (2-1/2"); 3 palce (3"); Jiné
nl: Compatibele hitch receiver maat: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Overig
pl: Kompatybilny rozmiar gniazda haka holowniczego: 1,25 cala (1-1/4"); 2 cale (2"); 2,5 cala (2-1/2"); 3 cale (3"); Inne
fi: Yhteensopiva vetokoukun vastaanottimen koko: 1,25 in (1 1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2 1/2"); 3 in (3"); Muu
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος υποδοχής κοτσαδόρου: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Άλλο
it: Compatibile gancio di traino piatto: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Altro
zh-TW: 相容的拖車鉤接收器尺寸: 1.25 吋 (1-1/4"); 2 吋 (2"); 2.5 吋 (2-1/2"); 3 吋 (3"); 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas prikabinimo imtuvo dydis: 1,25 col. (1-1/4"); 2 col. (2"); 2,5 col. (2-1/2"); 3 col. (3"); Kita
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на отвора за теглич: 1,25 инча (1-1/4"); 2 инча (2"); 2,5 инча (2-1/2"); 3 инча (3"); Друго
ja: 互換性のあるヒッチレシーバーサイズ: 1.25 インチ (1-1/4"); 2 インチ (2"); 2.5 インチ (2-1/2"); 3 インチ (3"); その他
es: Talla de receptor de enganche compatible: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Otro
ko: 호환 히치 리시버 크기: 1.25인치(1-1/4인치); 2인치(2인치); 2.5인치(2-1/2인치); 3인치(3인치); 기타
pt-BR: Tamanho do receptor de engate compatível: 1,25 pol (1-1/4"); 2 pol (2"); 2,5 pol (2-1/2"); 3 pol (3"); Outro
th: ขนาดช่องรับตะขอเกี่ยวที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: 1.25 นิ้ว (1-1/4"); 2 นิ้ว (2"); 2.5 นิ้ว (2-1/2"); 3 นิ้ว (3"); อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis vonóhorog-fogadó méret: 1,25 hüvelyk (1-1/4"); 2 hüvelyk (2"); 2,5 hüvelyk (2-1/2"); 3 hüvelyk (3"); Egyéb
da: Kompatibel størrelse på anhængertræk-modtager: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Andet
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost priklopa vlečne kljuke: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Drugo
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina prijamnika kuke: 1,25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2,5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Ostalo
tr: Uyumlu çeki demiri adaptör yuvası boyutu: 1,25 inç (1-1/4"); 2 inç (2"); 2,5 inç (2-1/2"); 3 inç (3"); Diğer
en: Compatible hitch receiver size: 1.25 in (1-1/4"); 2 in (2"); 2.5 in (2-1/2"); 3 in (3"); Other
pt-PT: Tamanho do recetor de engate compatível: 1,25 pol. (1-1/4"); 2 pol. (2"); 2,5 pol. (2-1/2"); 3 pol. (3"); Outro